District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.05

Release of information.

(a)

Any applicant to the Program shall agree to execute a release to allow the Department access to loan records, credit information, and information from lenders necessary to verify eligibility and to determine loan repayments. The applicant is required to submit all requested loan documentation prior to approval by the Program.

(b)

It is the responsibility of the participant to negotiate with each lending institution for the terms and conditions of the educational loan repayments. Any penalties associated with early repayment shall be the responsibility of the participant.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 6, 53 DCR 61